Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Part 1

Regional Transportation Authority of Middle Tennessee

64-8-101. Creation.

There is hereby established a regional transportation authority in the counties of Davidson, Sumner, Williamson, Wilson, Robertson, Cheatham, Maury, Dickson and Rutherford. In order for Davidson, Sumner, Williamson, Wilson, Robertson, Cheatham, Maury, Dickson or Rutherford County or any city, town or metropolitan government located within one (1) of these counties to participate in the regional transportation authority, the local government must pay its yearly local assessment to the authority within the time frame established by the authority. A county or city, town or metropolitan government may opt out of participation by means of a notice to the authority that it is ceasing payment of its yearly assessment or the failure of any local government to pay its yearly assessment, after notice and within a time frame as established by the authority, shall result in a presumption of the authority that the local government's wishes to opt out of participation in the authority. Such presumption may be overcome by the local governments payment of current and past due assessments within a time frame established by the authority. The regional transportation authority shall be a body corporate and politic, shall be governed and managed as provided for in this chapter and shall have the powers and duties provided for by this chapter and other applicable provisions of the law.

Acts 1988, ch. 1026, § 1; 1989, ch. 140, § 1; 2003, ch. 306, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The regional transportation authority of Middle Tennessee, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

64-8-102. Governing board.

The authority shall be governed by a board consisting of:

The county mayor or metropolitan mayor of each county included within the authority;

The mayor of each town or city included in the authority;

The commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee; and

Six (6) persons residing in the included counties to be appointed by the governor. In making these appointments, the governor shall strive to appoint people who will reflect the composition and interest of the population of the service area of the authority.

The ex officio members shall serve during their terms of office and the appointed members shall be appointed to five-year terms and may be reappointed.

The appointed members shall be persons representative of and knowledgeable concerning mass transit operations or service.

The board shall elect a chair and such other officers as it may deem necessary.

The board shall meet at least annually and may meet at any time on the call of the chair or upon request of a majority of the membership.

Any ex officio member may designate a representative who shall be entitled to vote and fully participate in the actions of the board.

Actions of the board shall require a majority vote of a quorum of the board, such quorum being set by the authority's bylaws.

The board may establish through bylaws an executive committee and such procedures and rules for its operation as it may deem necessary. The executive committee may be empowered to perform as the administrative body of the board. The executive committee may be empowered by the board to act in its stead.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation, but appointed or designated members may receive reimbursement for necessary travel expenses from funds available to the authority.

Acts 1988, ch. 1026, § 2; 1995, ch. 430, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2003, ch. 306, §§ 2-5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

64-8-103. Personnel.

The board may employ such personnel or contract for professional planning, engineering, management, operating and support services as it may deem necessary from funds available to it. The board may also utilize services or assistance from any included county or municipality, including the loan of personnel.

Acts 1988, ch. 1026, § 3; 1995, ch. 430, § 5.

64-8-104. Mass transit plans — Powers and duties of board.

The board shall develop a plan for providing mass transit services in the authority. The plan shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Establishment, location or relocation of transit routes;

Areas to be served;

Frequency and method of service;

Coordination of existing services;

Contributions by governments in the service area toward the cost of transit services;

Contracting or entering into agreements with existing entities to provide transit services or may establish and operate such services directly;

Sources and methods of funding existing or expanded services;

Provision of special services for disabled persons or other persons unable to use regularly scheduled and equipped services;

Provision of services for special events or occasions; and

Any other provisions necessary or desirable to establish a coordinated, reliable, scheduled regional service.

In addition to the powers to plan for mass transit services, the authority shall have the following additional powers and duties in order to implement its plans for mass transit and other transportation services:

To organize itself into a public body, elect officers and adopt bylaws for the purpose of carrying out the functions authorized by this chapter;

To sue and be sued in its name with any causes of action against the authority or recovery against the authority governed by the Tennessee Governmental Tort Liability Act, complied in title 29, chapter 20;

Enter into contracts and cooperative agreements with governmental, not-for-profit and for-profit entities;

Purchase, own, lease and dispose of real and personal property in furtherance of the purposes of and the implementation of the authority's transit and transportation plans;

Employ personnel or contract with public or private entities to construct or operate transportation and transit services;

Employ or contract for professional services, such as, but not limited to, management, planning, support, engineering, legal, accounting and auditing services;

Utilize for transit or transportation services any property, right-of-way, easement or other similar property owned or held by the state or any municipality, county or metropolitan government within the transportation service area of the authority that may be necessary and convenient for the implementation of the authority's transit and transportation plans so long as the governmental entity owning or controlling such property shall consent to the authority's use;

The implementation of the authority's transit and transportation plans will necessitate the acquisition, construction, operation, and maintenance of properties, facilities and equipment and the employment of personnel or contracting for services, all of which the authority is authorized to undertake and accomplish and all of which are hereby declared and deemed to be for public and governmental functions conducted by the authority. The authority is a public body corporate and politic and all powers and duties granted by this chapter are and shall be declared public and corporate purposes and matters of public necessity;

Establish local assessments to be paid by its city, town, metropolitan and county government members. The local assessment shall be based on a per capita and a flat rate. In establishing the per capita assessment, the authority shall use the population figures of the latest certified population of Tennessee incorporated municipalities and certified population of Tennessee counties as reported by the department of economic and community development. The per capita assessment established by the authority shall be at a rate of not less than ten cents (10¢) per capita nor greater than fifty cents (50¢) per capita. The authority shall establish a flat assessment of five hundred dollars ($500). For the purpose of calculating the assessment for any county or metropolitan government, the population of any town or city located wholly or partly within the county or the towns or cities within the geographic boundary of the metropolitan government, but which are not a part of the metropolitan government, shall not be included in the population of the county or metropolitan government. The authority's local assessment shall be imposed on October 1 of each calendar year, and the member government shall pay either the per capita rate or the flat assessment, whichever is greater. Failure of a city, town, metropolitan or county government to pay such assessment shall result in the loss of that government's participation in the benefits of the authority; and

To borrow money in order to proceed with or finish the construction of mass transit or other transportation services or to fund the capital cost of such services. The authority may enter into a security agreement pledging, as appropriate, to secure the loan with:

Anticipated forthcoming grants from the state or federal government pursuant to § 64-8-105, subject to the approval, restrictions and requirements of the state or federal government grantor; provided, however, that such approval must be reauthorized if such funds are not received within one (1) year of the initial approval;

Anticipated assessments from local governments pursuant to subdivision (b)(9); or

The authority's real or personal property.

Acts 1988, ch. 1026, § 4; 1995, ch. 430, § 6; 2003, ch. 306, § 6; 2005, ch. 170, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

64-8-105. Funds.

The board may solicit, accept and expend grants, appropriations, contributions or other funds from any source, public or private, and maintain an accounting of such receipts and expenditures, subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1988, ch. 1026, § 5.

64-8-106. Public service or assistance.

Any department or agency of the state or any county, municipality or metropolitan government included in the authority may, upon request of the board, provide any services or assistance to the board in preparing a plan or in organizing its operations.

Acts 1988, ch. 1026, § 6.